California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(10) When the obstacle to the cargo retrieval or return of equipment is within the scope of responsibility of the carrier or their agent and beyond the control of the invoiced or contracting party.

(c) An intermodal marine container provider shall not take any of the following actions:

(1) Charge back, deduct, or offset per diem charges, maintenance and repair charges, or peak hour pricing from a motor carrier’s freight bill.

(2) Unilaterally terminate, suspend, or restrict the equipment interchange rights of a motor carrier or driver that uses the dispute resolution process
 contained in the Uniform Intermodal Interchange and Facilities Access Agreement to contest a charge, fee, or fine, including a charge for maintenance and repairs imposed by the intermodal marine container provider, while the dispute resolution process is ongoing.

(3) Unilaterally terminate, suspend, or restrict the equipment interchange rights of a motor carrier for late payment of an undisputed invoice from the intermodal marine container provider, provided that the payment is no more than 60 days late.

(4) Unilaterally terminate, suspend, or restrict the equipment interchange rights of a motor carrier or driver for parking tickets issued by the intermodal marine terminal unless the tickets remain unpaid more than 60 days after being in receipt of the driver or motor carrier. No parking tickets shall be issued by the intermodal marine terminal to a driver or motor carrier for a
 parking violation if the assigned spot was occupied and the trouble window or terminal administration was unable to immediately provide a place to park, or if the driver was instructed to park the equipment in a different spot by intermodal marine terminal personnel or security.

(5) Willfully attempt to circumvent any provisions of this section or to fail, for any reason other than what is specified in the governing port tariff, to collect demurrage when due and payable and when consistent with this section. A motor carrier shall not be liable for any portion of demurrage when an intermodal container is not picked up during free time.

(6) Commence or continue free time if cargo is unavailable for retrieval and timely notice of cargo availability has not been provided.

(7) If a loaded container is not made available
 for pickup when a motor carrier arrives at the intermodal marine terminal, and all current charges have been paid, the intermodal marine terminal operator or intermodal marine container provider shall not impose any further cargo demurrage charges on the motor carrier, beneficial cargo owner, or other intermediary.

(d) Any provisions in this section related to acts at intermodal marine terminals shall be applied to acts at satellite facilities.

(e) As used in this chapter:

(1) “Closed” means that the terminal is not open or available to receive equipment. The marine terminal shall have posted working hours, and “closed” shall mean that the terminal is not open to release or accept equipment during those posted working hours.

(2) “Divert equipment” means
 the motor carrier has been directed to return the equipment to a location different from the location where the equipment was picked up by the motor carrier.

(3) “Free time” means the time period offered by the intermodal marine container provider free of charge, beyond which additional charges, including per diem, detention, demurrage, extended dwell, or charges of a similar kind or character, are to be applied.

(4) “Intermodal marine container provider” means the entity authorizing delivery or receipt of physical possession of the container with a motor carrier, beneficial cargo owner, or other intermediary.

(5) “Intermodal marine terminal” means a marine terminal that engages in discharging or receiving equipment owned, operated, or controlled by an equipment provider. “Intermodal marine terminal” shall not
 include a local, municipal, or special district public agency seaport.

(6) “Motor carrier” has the same meaning as defined in Section 408 of the Vehicle Code.

(7) “Per diem,” “detention,” or “demurrage” means a charge imposed by an intermodal marine container provider or marine terminal operator for late return or pickup of an empty or a loaded intermodal container.

(8) “Satellite facility” means an intermodal yard, that is not a marine terminal, within the same local commercial territory that supports operations of an intermodal marine container provider or intermodal marine terminal.

(9) “Shall not commence or continue free time or impose per diem, detention, demurrage, extended dwell, or charges of a similar kind or character on a motor carrier,
 beneficial cargo owner, or other intermediary” shall apply to the day or days in question that an occurrence referenced in subdivision (b) took place.

(10) “Written or electronic notification” means any communication by postal letter, facsimile, electronic mail, or other electronic notification.

(f) (1) Where provisions of this section are addressed by future federal law or regulation, and the federal law or regulation permits states to exceed the requirements set forth in the federal law or regulation, the more stringent provision shall govern.

(2) It is further not the intent of the Legislature to establish a reasonableness test under Section 41102 of Title 46 of the United States Code, as in effect on June 16, 2022, for the agreement by commercial entities to rates, charges, or service
 requirements.

(g) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 868, Sec. 1.   (AB 2406)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 29. Donated Property [22930. - 22930.]

22930.

(a) If a nonprofit organization engaged in any solicitation of personal property or sales solicitation for charitable purposes, or a commercial fundraiser, as defined in Section 12599 of the Government Code, solicits the donation of personal property for charitable purposes, the donation of which may be deductible pursuant to Section 17201 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, and the nonprofit organization or commercial fundraiser states either in writing or verbally the percentage of the donation that will be available or used for charitable purposes, the nonprofit organization or commercial fundraiser shall calculate, on an annual basis, that percentage based on the gross amount received from the disposition of the property, and the net amount paid to the charity for its programs, after subtracting the cost incurred by the nonprofit organization, the commercial fundraiser, or any other entity acting on behalf of the nonprofit organization to solicit, acquire, modify, and dispose of the property and any net income retained by the commercial fundraiser or any other entity acting on behalf of the nonprofit organization.

(b) If a person donates a motor vehicle, aircraft, or vessel to a nonprofit organization engaged in any solicitation or sales solicitation for charitable purposes or to a commercial fundraiser for charitable purposes, as defined in Section 12599 of the Government Code, and the donation may be deductible pursuant to Section 17201 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the nonprofit organization or commercial fundraiser shall send the donor a receipt for that property within 90 days from the date of the donation. The receipt shall describe the donated property in terms of its model, age, level of use, including, but not limited to, the mileage, in the case of a vehicle, and condition, and whether a visual inspection by the nonprofit organization or commercial fundraiser, or a representative of the nonprofit organization or commercial fundraiser, indicated that there were any readily apparent defects that would materially reduce the value of the property. The receipt shall also include the date the donation was made and shall indicate whether the property was operable or inoperable at the time of the donation.

(c) If the donated property is sold prior to the issuance of the receipt described in subdivision (b), the receipt issued pursuant to subdivision (b) shall also include all of the following:

(1) The date the property was sold.

(2) If the property was sold to a dismantler, the amount paid to the nonprofit organization or commercial fundraiser for the property.

(3) If the property was altered subsequent to the donation and the alteration affected the value of the property, a statement that the property was altered and whether the alteration increased or decreased the value of the property.

(d) The nonprofit organization or the commercial fundraiser shall retain a copy of the receipt for its records.

(e) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 348, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 30. Billing Practices [22940. - 22941.]

22940.

It shall be unlawful for any business to use words expressly referencing an individual’s marital status as part of the individual’s mailing address on a billing statement, related correspondence, enclosing envelope, or any solicitation for new business. This shall not prohibit the use of the prefix “Mr.,” “Mrs.,” “Ms.,” or “Miss.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 343, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

22941.

Any violation of this chapter shall be punishable by a civil penalty of up to two hundred fifty dollars ($250) for each violation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 343, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 31. Electrically Conductive Balloons [22942. - 22942.5.]

22942.

(a) A person who manufactures a foil balloon in this state shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Permanently mark each foil balloon with a printed statement, written in a legible font size and located in a conspicuous area on the foil balloon, that warns the consumer of at least one of the following:

(A) The dangers of releasing balloons that may come into contact with overhead power lines.

(B) If the foil balloon is manufactured to meet the requirements described in subdivision (d), the consumer’s responsibilities when disposing of foil balloons.

(2) Permanently mark each
 foil
 balloon with the identity of the manufacturer.

(3) Permanently mark each foil balloon that it is in compliance with this section if the foil balloon is manufactured to meet the requirements described in subdivision (d). Markings prescribed under the final standard by the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers (IEEE) shall be considered a suitable mark.

(b) A person who sells or distributes a foil balloon that is filled with
 lighter-than-air gas in this state 
 shall comply with both of the following:

(1) The person shall affix an object of sufficient weight to each
 foil balloon or its appurtenance to counter the lift capability of the foil balloon.

(2) The person shall not attach the foil balloon to an electrically conductive string, tether, or streamer, to a balloon constructed of electrically conductive material, or to any other electrically conductive object.

(c) This section shall not apply to manned hot air balloons or to balloons used in governmental or scientific research projects.

(d) A person that sells, offers for sale, or manufactures for sale, in
 this state, any foil balloon shall ensure that those foil balloons pass a standard test, as determined by an accredited testing facility capable of high-voltage testing.

(1) (A) The standard test shall be the IEEE 2845 standard when that standard is approved by the IEEE.

(B) The standard test shall be approved when the IEEE does all of the following:

(i) Publishes an interim standard.

(ii) Completes its trial of the interim standard.

(iii) Publishes the final approved standard, following
 materially substantive adjustments, if any, to the interim standard.

(2) This requirement is subject to the following phase-in period:

(A) At least 25 percent of the person’s foil balloons shall comply no later than one year from the commencement date.

(B) At least
 55 percent of the person’s foil balloons shall comply no later than two years from the commencement date.

(C) At least 80 percent of the person’s foil balloons shall comply no later than three years from the commencement date.

(D) One hundred percent of the person’s foil balloons shall comply no later than four years from the commencement date.

(e) Following the completion of the phase-in period outlined in subdivision (d) and notwithstanding any other law, a person shall not sell, offer for sale,
 or manufacture for sale, in this state, any foil balloon, unless the balloon complies with this section.

(f) (1) All of the following dates and time periods shall be tolled when a serious development, manufacturing, production, or supply chain issue, or force majeure, occurs:

(A) The commencement date.

(B) The phase-in period outlined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (d).

(C) The prohibition against selling, offering for sale, and manufacturing for sale outlined in subdivision (e).

(2) Tolling shall last for a period of 24 months or until the serious development, manufacturing, production, or supply chain issue, or force majeure, is resolved, whichever occurs first.

(3) A serious development, manufacturing, production, or supply
 chain issue, or force majeure, shall be deemed to have occurred if both of the following are satisfied:

(A) The issue is outside of the control of the business that develops, manufactures, produces, or sells foil balloons.

(B) The issue makes it infeasible to develop, manufacture, produce, or sell foil balloons that otherwise would be subject to the requirement of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(g) For the purposes of this section, the following terms
 apply:

(1) “Commencement date” means the date on which
 the IEEE
 approves the final
 standard for testing foil balloons at a level of electric distribution voltages without causing an electrical
 fault and all of the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) are met, or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.

(2) “Foil balloon” means a balloon that is constructed of
 electrically conductive material.

(3) “Infeasible” means incapable of being accomplished in a successful manner within a reasonable period of time, taking into account economic, environmental, legal, social, and technological factors.

(4) “Phase-in period” means the gradual phase in of the restrictions on the sale, offer for sale, and manufacture for sale, in this state, of a foil balloon following the commencement date, as set forth in subdivision (d).

(5) “Person” means any individual, association, organization, partnership, business trust, limited liability company, corporation, or other entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 401, Sec. 1.   (AB 847)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

22942.5.

(a) A person who violates or attempts to violate Section 22942 may be enjoined in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b) (1) A person who has violated Section 22942 is liable for a civil penalty in the amount of fifty dollars ($50) for each foil balloon that was sold, offered for sale, manufactured for sale, or distributed in violation of Section 22942. This civil penalty shall not exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per
 day for a totality of violations of Section 22942, in addition to any other penalty established by law. This civil penalty may be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(2) In assessing the amount of a civil penalty for a violation of this chapter, the court shall consider all of the following:

(A) The nature and extent of the violation.

(B) The number and severity of the violations.

(C) The economic effect of the penalty on the person who violated Section 22942.

(D) The person’s annual revenue in both balloon sales and total sales.

(E) Whether the person who violated Section 22942 took good faith measures to comply with Section 22942 and when these measures were taken.

(F) The deterrent effect that the imposition of the penalty would have on both the person who violated Section 22942 and the regulated community as a whole.

(G) The willfulness of the persons responsible for the violation.

(H) Any other factors that justice may require.

(c) Actions pursuant to this section may be brought by the Attorney General in the name of the people of the state, by a district attorney, by a city attorney, or by a city prosecutor in a city or city and county having a full-time city prosecutor.

(d) Civil penalties collected pursuant to this section shall be paid to the office of the city attorney, city prosecutor, district attorney, or Attorney General, whichever office brought the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 401, Sec. 2.   (AB 847)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 31.3. Online Cannabis Marketplaces [22943. - 22943.6.]

22943.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Advertisement” means an advertisement about, or an offer of, the sale of cannabis or a cannabis product.

(b) “Business information” means an internet website, mobile application, address, or telephone number through which a seller offers to sell, or a consumer makes a purchase of, cannabis or a cannabis product.

(c) “Cannabis” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 26001.

(d) “Cannabis product” has the same meaning as “cannabis products” as defined in Section 26001.

(e) “Clear and conspicuous” means in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the language. The Attorney General may promulgate regulations further defining clear and conspicuous.

(f) “License” means a license issued by the Department of Cannabis Control pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000).

(g) “Online cannabis marketplace” means an internet website, online service, online application, or mobile application, or a portion thereof, including a social media platform, as defined in Section 1798.99.20 of the Civil Code, that does any of the following in California:

(1) Transmits or otherwise communicates between a
 third-party seller and consumer an offer for the sale of cannabis or a cannabis product that is accepted by the consumer.

(2) Offers for sale cannabis or a cannabis product.

(3) Connects a third-party
 seller of cannabis or cannabis products and a consumer.

(h) “Third-party seller” means a person or entity, independent of an online marketplace, who sells, offers to sell, or contracts with an online marketplace to sell a product in the state by or through an online marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 411, Sec. 2.   (SB 378)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 22943.6.)
-------------------------------------------

22943.2.

(a) An online cannabis marketplace shall address in its terms of service both of the following:

(1) Whether the online cannabis marketplace permits advertisements from, or business information about, unlicensed sellers of cannabis or cannabis products to be viewed by Californians on its marketplace.

(2) Whether the online cannabis marketplace verifies that a seller of cannabis or cannabis products has a valid, unexpired license by consulting the license look-up function on the Department of Cannabis Control’s internet website established pursuant to Section 26012.5 before displaying, storing, or hosting the
 seller’s advertisements or business information in a manner that is viewable to Californians.

(b) (1) An online cannabis marketplace shall establish a clear and conspicuous mechanism within its internet-based service that allows any individual, whether or not that individual has a profile on the internet-based service or is a user, to report to the online cannabis marketplace the display, storing, or hosting on the marketplace of advertisements from, or business information about, an unlicensed seller of cannabis or cannabis products.

(2) The mechanism required by this subdivision shall meet all of the following criteria:

(A) The mechanism shall allow, but not require, an individual to do both of the
 following:

(i) Upload a screenshot of the content that offers evidence of advertisements from, or business information about, the unlicensed seller on the marketplace.

(ii) Provide the marketplace with basic identifying information, such as an account identifier or URL, sufficient to permit marketplace to locate the reported material.

(B) The mechanism shall include, but not be limited to, a method for the marketplace to contact a reporting individual in writing, including a telephone number for purposes of sending text messages, an email address, or another reasonable electronic method of communication.

(C) The mechanism shall provide, within 36 hours of
 receipt of a report, a written confirmation to the reporting individual that the marketplace has received that individual’s report.

(D) (i) The mechanism shall provide periodic written updates to the reporting individual as to the status of the marketplace’s handling of the reported material using the method of communication pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(ii) The first written update required by clause (i) shall be provided as soon as reasonably feasible but no later than 14 days after the date on which the written confirmation required under subparagraph (C) is provided. Subsequent written updates shall be provided as soon as reasonably feasible but no later than 14 days after the most recent written update provided pursuant to this clause, until the final
 written determination required by subparagraph (F).

(E) Each report shall receive a review by a natural person.

(F) (i) The mechanism shall issue a final written determination to the reporting individual within 30 days of receiving the report. The final written determination shall state one of the following:

(I) The report has provided evidence that an advertisement from, or business information about, an unlicensed seller of cannabis or cannabis products was displayed, stored, or hosted on the marketplace and the seller’s advertisements and business information have been blocked from being viewable on the marketplace.

(II) The report has
 provided evidence that an advertisement from, or business information about, an unlicensed seller of cannabis or cannabis products was or is displayed, stored, or hosted on the marketplace and the seller’s advertisements and business information will not be blocked from being viewable on the marketplace. The final written determination issued pursuant to this subclause shall also state that the marketplace acknowledges that it is aware that the seller is unlicensed and whether the marketplace has referred the report to a law enforcement agency. If the marketplace has referred the report to a law enforcement agency, the final written determination shall provide a true and correct copy of the report that the marketplace made to the law enforcement agency.

(III) The report lacks evidence that the identified seller of cannabis or cannabis
 products who was or is displayed, stored, or hosted on the marketplace is unlicensed and the seller’s advertisements and business information will not be blocked from being viewable on the marketplace.

(IV) The report lacks evidence that the identified seller of cannabis or cannabis products whose advertisement or business information was or is displayed, stored, or hosted on the marketplace is unlicensed and the seller’s advertisements and business information will be blocked from being viewable on the marketplace for reasons unrelated to the seller’s licensing status.

(V) The report lacks evidence that an advertisement or business information of a seller of cannabis or cannabis products was displayed, stored, or hosted on the marketplace.

(ii) If the marketplace cannot comply with clause (i) within 30 days due to circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the marketplace, the marketplace shall comply with clause (i) no later than 60 days after the date on which the report was received. If this clause applies, the marketplace shall promptly provide written notice of the delay, no later than 48 hours from the time the marketplace knew the delay was likely to occur, to the reporting individual.

(c) This section shall not be interpreted to prohibit any individual from reporting activity by an unlicensed seller of cannabis or cannabis products without the use of the mechanism established in subdivision (b).

(d) (1) Any online cannabis marketplace that violates a requirement of this
 section shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation and for compensatory damages, punitive damages, and any civil remedies, penalties, or sanctions for harms caused by the marketplace’s failure to comply with this chapter, which damages shall be adjudicated and awarded apart from any harms attributable to the existence of the reported content alone.

(2) Any person may bring an action to enforce this section. In addition to other equitable relief, the court may order injunctive relief to obtain compliance with this section and shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing plaintiff.

(3) A person shall not bring an action to enforce
 paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) if the marketplace, upon receipt of the advertisement or business information through the mechanism, removes the reported advertisement or business information within 48 hours.

(4) It is not a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) if the marketplace, upon receipt of the report, removes the reported advertisement or business information within 48 hours.

(5) Each day an online cannabis marketplace is in violation of a requirement of this section constitutes a separate violation.

(e) The duties and obligations imposed by this section are cumulative with any other duties or obligations imposed under other law and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 411, Sec. 2.   (SB 378)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 22943.6.)
-------------------------------------------

22943.4.

(a) If an online cannabis marketplace does not verify that a seller of cannabis or cannabis products is licensed as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 22943.2, the online cannabis marketplace shall, immediately after a consumer has accessed the marketplace, interpose a clear and conspicuous graphic that a consumer must acknowledge and click through before viewing or engaging with the marketplace. The graphic shall warn the consumer that the marketplace may be displaying, storing, or hosting unlicensed sellers of cannabis or cannabis products.

(b) Any person who identifies an online cannabis marketplace that displays, stores, or hosts an
 advertisement from, or business information about, an unlicensed seller of cannabis or cannabis products in violation of subdivision (a) may initiate an action to
 enforce subdivision (a). A person who prevails in such an action shall be entitled to both of the following:

(1) Reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs.

(2) A civil penalty of up to two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(c) An online cannabis marketplace that violates an injunction requiring compliance with this section shall be prohibited from operating in California until a receiver appointed by the court issuing the injunction affirms to the court that the marketplace is in compliance. In any action to enforce an injunction requiring compliance with this section, the party obtaining enforcement shall be
 entitled to an award of its reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs and a civil penalty of up to
 five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).

(d) This section shall not be construed as prohibiting a public prosecutor, as described in Section 17204, from bringing an appropriate action to enforce this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 411, Sec. 2.   (SB 378)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 22943.6.)
-------------------------------------------

22943.6.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 411, Sec. 2.   (SB 378)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 31.4. Online Hemp Marketplaces [22944. - 22944.4.]

22944.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Advertisement” means an advertisement about, or an offer of, a sale of an intoxicating hemp product.

(b) “Business information” means an internet website, mobile application, address, or telephone number through which a seller offers to sell, or a consumer makes a purchase of, an
 intoxicating hemp product.

(c) “Clear and conspicuous” means in larger type than the surrounding text, or in contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of the same size, or set off from the surrounding text of the same size by symbols or other marks that call attention to the language. The Attorney General may promulgate regulations further defining clear and conspicuous.

(d) “Industrial hemp product” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (g) of Section 111920 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) “Inhalable hemp product” includes any hemp product that can be used by inhalation, including, but not limited to, hemp flower, hemp prerolls, hemp vaping cartridges, liquids,
 or prefilled devices, hemp shatter, wax, budder, or other hemp derived concentrates that can be used for inhalation.

(f) “Intoxicating hemp product” means either of the following:

(1) A hemp product whose THC concentration exceeds the amounts allowable under the Sherman Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Law (Part 5 (commencing with Section 109875) of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code) or any rules or regulations adopted
 thereunder, and is unlawful to sell without a license.

(2) An inhalable hemp product with a detectable THC concentration, and is unlawful to sell without a license.

(g) “Licensed” means licensed pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000).

(h) “Online hemp marketplace” means an internet website, online service, online application, or mobile application, or a portion thereof, including a social media platform, as defined in Section 1798.99.20 of the Civil Code,
 that, as applied to products containing hemp for human consumption, including, but not limited to, cosmetics, food, food additives, dietary supplements, or lotions,
 does any of the following in California:

(1) Transmits or otherwise communicates between a third-party seller and consumer an offer for the sale of an intoxicating hemp product that is accepted by the
 consumer.

(2) Offers for sale an intoxicating hemp product.

(3) Connects a third-party seller of an intoxicating hemp product and a consumer.

(i) “Third-party seller” means a person or entity, independent of an online marketplace, who sells, offers to sell, or contracts with an online marketplace to sell a product in the state by or through an online
 marketplace.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 411, Sec. 3.   (SB 378)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 22944.4.)
-------------------------------------------

22944.2.

(a) (1) An online hemp marketplace shall establish a clear and conspicuous mechanism within its internet-based service that allows any individual, whether or not that individual has a profile on the internet-based service or is a user, to report to the online hemp marketplace the existence on the marketplace of an advertisement of an intoxicating hemp product.

(2) The mechanism required by this subdivision shall meet all of the following criteria:

(A) The mechanism shall allow, but not require, an individual to do both of the following:

(i) Upload a screenshot of the content that offers evidence of an offer of a sale of an intoxicating hemp product on the marketplace.

(ii) Provide to the online hemp marketplace basic identifying information, such as an account identifier or URL, sufficient to permit the marketplace to locate the reported material.

(B) The mechanism shall include, but not be limited to, a method for the online hemp marketplace to contact a reporting individual in writing, including a telephone number for purposes of sending text messages, an email address, or another reasonable electronic method of communication.

(C) The mechanism shall provide, within 36 hours of receipt of a report, a written confirmation to the reporting
 individual that the marketplace has received that individual’s report.

(D) (i) The mechanism shall provide periodic written updates to the reporting individual as to the status of the marketplace’s handling of the reported material using the method of communication pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(ii) The first written update required by clause (i) shall be provided as soon as reasonably feasible but no later than 14 days after the date on which the written confirmation required under subparagraph (C) is provided. Subsequent written updates shall be provided as soon as reasonably feasible but no later than 14 days after the most recent written update provided pursuant to this clause, until the final written determination required by subparagraph (F).

(E) Each report shall receive a review by a natural person.

(F) (i) The mechanism shall issue a final written determination to the reporting individual within 30 days of receiving the report. The final written determination shall state one of the following:

(I) The report has provided evidence that an advertisement of an intoxicating hemp product was displayed, stored, or hosted on the marketplace and the seller’s advertisements and business information have been blocked from being viewable on the marketplace.

(II) The report has provided evidence that an advertisement of an intoxicating hemp product was or is displayed, stored, or hosted on
 the marketplace and the seller’s advertisements and business information will not be blocked from being viewable on the marketplace. The final written determination issued pursuant to this subclause shall also state that the marketplace acknowledges that it is aware that the seller is advertising an intoxicating hemp product and whether the marketplace has referred the report to a law enforcement agency. If the marketplace has referred the report to a law enforcement agency, the final written determination shall provide a true and correct copy of the report that the marketplace made to the law enforcement agency.

(III) The report lacks evidence that the identified seller whose advertisement or business information was or is displayed, stored, or hosted on the marketplace was or is advertising an intoxicating hemp product and the seller’s
 advertisements and business information will not be blocked from being viewable on the marketplace.

(IV) The report lacks evidence that the identified seller whose advertisements and business information was or is displayed, stored, or hosted on the marketplace was or is advertising an intoxicating hemp product and the seller’s advertisements and business information will be blocked from being viewable on the marketplace for reasons unrelated to the reported advertisement of an intoxicating hemp product.

(V) The report lacks evidence that an advertisement of an intoxicated hemp product was or is displayed, stored, or hosted on the marketplace.

(ii) If the marketplace cannot comply with clause (i) within 30 days
 due to circumstances beyond the reasonable control of the marketplace, the marketplace shall comply with clause (i) no later than 60 days after the date on which the report was received. If this clause applies, the marketplace shall promptly provide written notice of the delay, no later than 48 hours from the time the marketplace knew the delay was likely to occur, to the reporting individual.

(b) This section shall not be interpreted to prohibit any individual from reporting the advertisement of intoxicating hemp without the use of the mechanism established in subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Any online hemp marketplace that violates a requirement of this section shall be liable for a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation and for
 compensatory damages, punitive damages, and any civil remedies, penalties, or sanctions for harms caused by the marketplace’s failure to comply with this chapter, which damages shall be adjudicated and awarded apart from any harms attributable to the existence of the reported content alone.

(2) A person may bring an action to enforce this section. In addition to other equitable relief, the court may order injunctive relief to obtain compliance with this section and shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs to the prevailing plaintiff.

(3) A person shall not bring an action to enforce paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) if the marketplace, upon receipt of the advertisement or business information through the
 mechanism, removes the reported advertisement or business information within 48 hours.

(4) It is not a violation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) if the marketplace, upon receipt of the report, removes the reported advertisement or business information within 48 hours. 

(5) Each day an online hemp marketplace is in violation of a requirement of this section constitutes a separate violation.

(d) The duties and obligations imposed by this section are cumulative with any other duties
 or obligations imposed under other law and shall not be construed to relieve any party from any duties or obligations imposed under other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 411, Sec. 3.   (SB 378)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, pursuant to Section 22944.4.)
-------------------------------------------

22944.4.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 411, Sec. 3.   (SB 378)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 31.5. Drug Safety Policies on Social Media Platforms [22945. - 22945.9.]

22945.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply: 

(1) (A) “Content” means statements or comments made by users and media that are created, posted, shared, or otherwise interacted with by users on an internet-based service or application.

(B) “Content” does not include media put on a service or application exclusively for the purpose of cloud storage, transmitting files, or file collaboration.

(2) “Controlled substance” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 11007 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Social media platform” means a public or semipublic internet-based service or application that has users in California and that meets both of the following criteria:
